morpheme-stripper/apertium-id-ms-stripmorpheme.lexc
LEXICON check_person
%<p1%>@R.PERSON.p1@:0@R.PERSON.p1@                            check_adjective_type ;
%<p2%>@R.PERSON.p2@:0@R.PERSON.p2@                            check_adjective_type ;
%<p3%>@R.PERSON.p3@:0@R.PERSON.p3@                            check_adjective_type ;
@D.PERSON@                                                    check_adjective_type ;

LEXICON check_adjective_type
%<positive%>@R.DERADJ.positive@:0@R.DERADJ.positive@          check_number ;
%<sup%>@R.DERADJ.sup@:0@R.DERADJ.sup@                         check_number ;
%<manner%>@R.DERADJ.manner@:0@R.DERADJ.manner@                check_number ;
%<exceed%>@R.DERADJ.exceed@:0@R.DERADJ.exceed@                check_number ;
%<uni%>@R.DERADJ.uni@:0@R.DERADJ.uni@                         check_number ;
%<possib%>@R.DERADJ.possib@:0@R.DERADJ.possib@                check_number ;
%<mimic%>@R.DERADJ.mimic@:0@R.DERADJ.mimic@                   check_number ;
@D.DERADJ@                                                    check_number ;

LEXICON check_number
%<sg%>@R.NUM.sg@:0@R.NUM.sg@                                  check_capital ;
%<pl%>@R.NUM.pl@:0@R.NUM.pl@                                  check_capital ;
@D.NUM@                                                       check_capital ;

! ignores capitalization
LEXICON check_capital
!%<cap%>@R.CAP.on@:0@R.CAP.on@                                 enclitic ;
!@D.CAP@                                                       enclitic ;
                                                       enclitic ;




LEXICON enclitic
%+aku%<prn%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<enc%>%<pos%>@R.DERNOUN@:00ku00000@R.DERNOUN@                   CheckParticle ;
%+kamu%<prn%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<enc%>%<pos%>@R.DERNOUN@:000mu00000@R.DERNOUN@                 CheckParticle ;
%+kamu%<prn%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<enc%>%<pos%>@R.DERNOUN@:00kau00000@R.DERNOUN@                 CheckParticle ;
%+dia%<prn%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<enc%>%<pos%>@R.DERNOUN@:0nya00000@R.DERNOUN@                   CheckParticle ;
%+aku%<prn%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<enc%>@R.VOICE@:00ku0000@R.VOICE@                               CheckParticle ;
%+kamu%<prn%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<enc%>@R.VOICE@:000mu0000@R.VOICE@                             CheckParticle ;
%+kamu%<prn%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<enc%>@R.VOICE@:00kau0000@R.VOICE@                             CheckParticle ;
%+dia%<prn%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<enc%>@R.VOICE@:0nya0000@R.VOICE@                               CheckParticle ;
                                                                                         CheckParticle ;
!%<det%>00@D.VOICE@:nya@D.VOICE@                                                                            CheckParticle ;  !! determiner

LEXICON CheckParticle
%+kah%<part%>@D.POS.question@@R.MARKP.toparticle@:0kah0@D.POS.question@@R.MARKP.toparticle@                   # ;
000@R.POS.question@:kah@R.POS.question@                                       # ;
%+lah%<part%>@R.MARKP.toparticle@:0lah0@R.MARKP.toparticle@                   # ;
%+tah%<part%>@R.MARKP.toparticle@:0tah0@R.MARKP.toparticle@                   # ;
%+pun%<part%>@R.MARKP.toparticle@:0pun0@R.MARKP.toparticle@                   # ;
                                                                              # ;



!!! -- Monolingual Dictionary --
!!! 
!!! 
!!! ----------------------------------------------------------------


LEXICON adjective
<a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z|"-">        adjective ;
@P.POS.adj@                                                      branching ;



LEXICON coordinating_conjunction
dan@P.POS.cnjcoo@             branching ;
atau@P.POS.cnjcoo@            branching ;
maupun@P.POS.cnjcoo@          branching ;


LEXICON determiner
itu@P.POS.det@                branching ;
ini@P.POS.det@                branching ;
suatu@P.POS.det@              branching ;
seluruh@P.POS.det@            branching ;
keseluruhan@P.POS.det@        branching ;
tertentu@P.POS.det@           branching ;
tiap@P.POS.det@               branching ;
tiap00@P.POS.det@:setiap@P.POS.det@            branching ;
semua@P.POS.det@              branching ;
semua0@P.POS.det@:segala@P.POS.det@            branching ;
banyak@P.POS.det@             branching ;
beberapa@P.POS.det@           branching ;


LEXICON interjection
ah@P.POS.interjection@        branching ;
betapa@P.POS.interjection@    branching ;
aduhai@P.POS.interjection@    branching ;


LEXICON noun
<a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z|"-">        noun ;
@P.POS.n@                                                        branching ;


LEXICON numeral
satu@P.POS.num@                 branching ;
dua@P.POS.num@                  branching ;
tiga@P.POS.num@                 branching ;
empat@P.POS.num@                branching ;
lima@P.POS.num@                 branching ;
enam@P.POS.num@                 branching ;
tujuh@P.POS.num@                branching ;
delapan@P.POS.num@              branching ;
sembilan@P.POS.num@             branching ;
sepuluh@P.POS.num@              branching ;
sebelas@P.POS.num@              branching ;
puluh@P.POS.num@                branching ;
ratus@P.POS.num@                branching ;
ribu@P.POS.num@                 branching ;
juta@P.POS.num@                 branching ;
milyar@P.POS.num@               branching ;
miliar@P.POS.num@               branching ;
triliun@P.POS.num@              branching ;

LEXICON question
apa@P.POS.question@             branching ;
apa@P.POS.question@             branching ;
bagaimana@P.POS.question@       branching ;
kapan@P.POS.question@           branching ;
kenapa@P.POS.question@          branching ;
siapa@P.POS.question@           branching ;
berapa@P.POS.question@          branching ;

LEXICON subordinating_conjunction
ketika@P.POS.cnjsub@             branching ;
agar@P.POS.cnjsub@               branching ;
apabila@P.POS.cnjsub@            branching ;
apabila0@P.POS.cnjsub@:bilamana@P.POS.cnjsub@            branching ;
apabila@P.POS.cnjsub@:000jika@P.POS.cnjsub@              branching ;
bahwa@P.POS.cnjsub@              branching ;
bahwa00000@P.POS.cnjsub@:bahwasanya@P.POS.cnjsub@        branching ;
daripada@P.POS.cnjsub@           branching ;
demikian@P.POS.cnjsub@           branching ;
demi@P.POS.cnjsub@               branching ;
kalau@P.POS.cnjsub@              branching ;
karena@P.POS.cnjsub@             branching ;
kendati@P.POS.cnjsub@            branching ;
lantaran@P.POS.cnjsub@           branching ;
maklum@P.POS.cnjsub@             branching ;
meski@P.POS.cnjsub@              branching ;
namun@P.POS.cnjsub@              branching ;
padahal@P.POS.cnjsub@            branching ;
sambil@P.POS.cnjsub@             branching ;
seakan%-akan@P.POS.cnjsub@       branching ;
sebagaimana@P.POS.cnjsub@        branching ;
sebelum@P.POS.cnjsub@            branching ;
selagi@P.POS.cnjsub@             branching ;
seperti@P.POS.cnjsub@            branching ;
supaya@P.POS.cnjsub@             branching ;
tatkala@P.POS.cnjsub@            branching ;
yang@P.POS.cnjsub@               branching ;
kecuali@P.POS.cnjsub@            branching ;
tetapi@P.POS.cnjsub@             branching ;
tetapi@P.POS.cnjsub@:00tapi@P.POS.cnjsub@                 branching ;


LEXICON verb
<a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z|"-">        verb ;
@P.POS.v@                                                        branching ;

LEXICON particle
lah@P.POS.part@             branching ;
kah@P.POS.part@             branching ;
tah@P.POS.part@             branching ;
pun@P.POS.part@             branching ;

LEXICON preposition
di@P.POS.pr@                branching ;
ke@P.POS.pr@                branching ;
untuk@P.POS.pr@             branching ;
untuk@P.POS.pr@:bagi0@P.POS.pr@          branching ;
untuk@P.POS.pr@:atas0@P.POS.pr@          branching ;
tentang@P.POS.pr@           branching ;
pada00@P.POS.pr@:kepada@P.POS.pr@        branching ;
dari@P.POS.pr@              branching ;
dari0000@P.POS.pr@:daripada@P.POS.pr@    branching ;
dalam@P.POS.pr@             branching ;
pada@P.POS.pr@              branching ;
oleh@P.POS.pr@              branching ;
pada0000@P.POS.pr@:terhadap@P.POS.pr@    branching ;
menurut@P.POS.pr@           branching ;
antara@P.POS.pr@            branching ;

LEXICON pronoun
saya@P.POS.prn@@P.PERSON.p1@@P.NUM.sg@                 branching ;
aku@P.POS.prn@@P.PERSON.p1@@P.NUM.sg@                  branching ;
anda@P.POS.prn@@P.PERSON.p2@@P.NUM.sg@                 branching ;
kamu@P.POS.prn@@P.PERSON.p2@@P.NUM.sg@                 branching ;
kamu@P.POS.prn@@P.PERSON.p2@@P.NUM.sg@:au00@P.POS.prn@@P.PERSON.p2@@P.NUM.sg@      branching ;
dia@P.POS.prn@@P.PERSON.p3@@P.NUM.sg@                  branching ;
kami@P.POS.prn@@P.PERSON.p1@@P.NUM.pl@                 branching ;
kita@P.POS.prn@@P.PERSON.p1@@P.NUM.pl@                 branching ;
kalian@P.POS.prn@@P.PERSON.p2@@P.NUM.pl@               branching ;
mereka@P.POS.prn@@P.PERSON.p3@@P.NUM.pl@               branching ;
beliau@P.POS.prn@@P.PERSON.p3@@P.NUM.sg@               branching ;
0aku@P.POS.prn@@P.PERSON.p1@@P.NUM.sg@:daku@P.POS.prn@@P.PERSON.p1@@P.NUM.sg@      branching ;
0kamu@P.POS.prn@@P.PERSON.p2@@P.NUM.sg@:dikau@P.POS.prn@@P.PERSON.p2@@P.NUM.sg@    branching ;

LEXICON copula
adalah@P.POS.v@@P.VERBVAR.vbser@                                                   branching ;
adalah@P.POS.v@@P.VERBVAR.vbser@:0ialah@P.POS.v@@P.VERBVAR.vbser@                  branching ;


LEXICON punctuation
%(        # ;
%)        # ;
%@        # ;
%?        # ;
%=        # ;


!!! -- End -- !!!
